Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9609
Treating physician.

A treating physician while acting in good faith in the course of his or her professional practice as authorized by the Investigational Drug Use Act may not be subject to arrest, prosecution, penalty, or denial of any right or privilege granted otherwise.

Laws 2018, LB117, § 9.
July 19, 2018